Hawaii statutes.
§89-6 Appropriate bargaining units.
(a) All employees throughout the State within any of the following categories
shall constitute an appropriate bargaining unit:

(1) Nonsupervisory employees in blue collar
positions;

(2) Supervisory employees in blue collar positions;

(3) Nonsupervisory employees in white collar
positions;

(4) Supervisory employees in white collar positions;

(5) Teachers and other personnel of the department of
education under the same pay schedule, including part-time employees working
less than twenty hours a week who are equal to one-half of a full-time
equivalent;

(6) Educational officers and other personnel of the
department of education under the same pay schedule;

(7) Faculty of the University of Hawaii and the
community college system;

(8) Personnel of the University of Hawaii and the
community college system, other than faculty;

(9) Registered professional nurses;

(10) Institutional, health, and correctional workers;

(11) Firefighters;

(12) Police officers;

(13) Professional and scientific employees, who cannot
be included in any of the other bargaining units; and

(14) State law enforcement officers and state and
county ocean safety and water safety officers.

(b) Because of the nature of work involved and
the essentiality of certain occupations that require specialized training,
supervisory employees who are eligible for inclusion in units (9) through (14)
shall be included in units (9) through (14), respectively, instead of unit (2)
or (4).

(c) The classification systems of each
jurisdiction shall be the bases for differentiating blue collar from white
collar employees, professional from institutional, health and correctional
workers, supervisory from nonsupervisory employees, teachers from educational
officers, and faculty from nonfaculty. In differentiating supervisory from
nonsupervisory employees, class titles alone shall not be the basis for
determination. The nature of the work, including whether a major portion of
the working time of a supervisory employee is spent as part of a crew or team
with nonsupervisory employees, shall be considered also.

(d) For the purpose of negotiating a
collective bargaining agreement, the public employer of an appropriate
bargaining unit shall mean the governor together with the following employers:

(1) For bargaining units (1), (2), (3), (4), (9),
(10), (13), and (14), the governor shall have six votes and the mayors, the
chief justice, and the Hawaii health systems corporation board shall each have
one vote if they have employees in the particular bargaining unit;

(2) For bargaining units (11) and (12), the governor
shall have four votes and the mayors shall each have one vote;

(3) For bargaining units (5) and (6), the governor
shall have three votes, the board of education shall have two votes, and the
superintendent of education shall have one vote; and

(4) For bargaining units (7) and (8), the governor
shall have three votes, the board of regents of the University of Hawaii shall
have two votes, and the president of the University of Hawaii shall have one
vote.

Any decision to be reached by the applicable
employer group shall be on the basis of simple majority, except when a
bargaining unit includes county employees from more than one county. In that
case, the simple majority shall include at least one county.

(e) In addition to a collective bargaining
agreement under subsection (d), each employer may negotiate, independently of
one another, supplemental agreements that apply to their respective employees;
provided that any supplemental agreement reached between the employer and the
exclusive representative shall not extend beyond the term of the applicable
collective bargaining agreement and shall not require ratification by employees
in the bargaining unit.

(f) The following individuals shall not be
included in any appropriate bargaining unit or be entitled to coverage under
this chapter:

(1) Elected or appointed official;

(2) Member of any board or commission; provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a member of a collective bargaining
unit from serving on a governing board of a charter school, on the state public
charter school commission, or as a charter school authorizer established under
chapter 302D;

(3) Top-level managerial and administrative
personnel, including the department head, deputy or assistant to a department
head, administrative officer, director, or chief of a state or county agency or
major division, and legal counsel;

(4) Secretary to top-level managerial and
administrative personnel under paragraph (3);

(5) Individual concerned with confidential matters
affecting employee-employer relations;

(6) Part-time employee working less than twenty hours
per week, except part-time employees included in unit (5);

(7) Temporary employee of three months' duration or
less;

(8) Employee of the executive office of the governor
or a household employee at Washington Place;

(9) Employee of the executive office of the
lieutenant governor;

(10) Employee of the executive office of the mayor;

(11) Staff of the legislative branch of the State;

(12) Staff of the legislative branches of the
counties, except employees of the clerks' offices of the counties;

(13) Any commissioned and enlisted personnel of the
Hawaii national guard;

(14) Inmate, kokua, patient, ward, or student of a
state institution;

(15) Student help;

(16) Staff of the Hawaii labor relations board;

(17) Employees of the Hawaii national guard youth
challenge academy; or

(18) Employees of the office of elections.

(g) Where any controversy arises under this
section, the board shall, pursuant to chapter 91, make an investigation and,
after a hearing upon due notice, make a final determination on the
applicability of this section to specific individuals, employees, or positions.
[L 1970, c 171, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 36, §1; am L 1975, c 162, §1; am L 1976,
c 13, §1; am L 1977, c 191, §1; am L 1987, c 184, §1 and c 311, §1; am L 1988,
c 394, §1 and c 399, §2; gen ch 1993; am L 1996, c 89, §5; am L 2000, c 253,
§96; am L 2002, c 65, §4; am L 2005, c 202, §3 and c 245, §§5, 8; am L 2006, c
38, §32 and c 298, §§7, 25; am L 2007, c 115, §§3, 16 and c 294, §2; am L 2008,
c 16, §18; am L Sp 2008, c 5, §1; am L 2010, c 106, §2; am L 2012, c 130, §5;
am L 2013, c 137, §2]

Note

No impairment of rights, benefits, and privileges as a result
of employees being transitioned to bargaining unit (14). L 2013, c 137, §5.

Case Notes

Cited: 131 H. 82 (App.), 315 P.3d 233 (2011).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next